Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.040

Records officers—Designation—Powers and duties.

Each department or other agency of the state government shall designate a records officer to supervise its records program and to represent the office in all contacts with the records committee, hereinafter created, and the division of archives and records management. The records officer shall:

(1) Coordinate all aspects of the records management program.

(2) Inventory, or manage the inventory, of all public records at least once during a biennium for disposition scheduling and transfer action, in accordance with procedures prescribed by the state archivist and state records committee: PROVIDED, That essential records shall be inventoried and processed in accordance with chapter 40.10 RCW at least annually.

(3) Consult with any other personnel responsible for maintenance of specific records within his or her state organization regarding records retention and transfer recommendations.

(4) Analyze records inventory data, examine and compare divisional or unit inventories for duplication of records, and recommend to the state archivist and state records committee minimal retentions for all copies commensurate with legal, financial, and administrative needs.

(5) Approve all records inventory and destruction requests which are submitted to the state records committee.

(6) Review established records retention schedules at least annually to insure that they are complete and current.

(7) Exercise internal control over the acquisition of filming and file equipment.

If a particular agency or department does not wish to transfer records at a time previously scheduled therefor, the records officer shall, within thirty days, notify the archivist and request a change in such previously set schedule, including his or her reasons therefor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 818; 1982 c 36 s 4; 1979 c 151 s 51; 1973 c 54 s 3; 1957 c 246 s 4.]